src/fst/morphology/affixes/symbols.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Symbol affixes

LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
 +N+Symbol: SYMBOL_connector ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
 +N+Symbol: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_connector
               SYMBOL_NO_suff ; ! §
          :%:  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §:sne
 +Err/Orth:    SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §esne
 +Err/Orth:%-e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §-esne
 +Err/Orth:%'e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §'esne

LEXICON SYMBOL_NO_suff
 +Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_suff
 +Sg+Gen:       ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Acc:v       ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Ill:j      ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Ine:n     ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Ela:st     ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Ela+Use/NG:s     ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Com:jna     ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/NG:jn     ENDLEX ;
    +Ess:n     ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Nom:       ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Gen:j      ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd     ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda     ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn     ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Ela:jst    ENDLEX ;
 +Pl+Com:j ENDLEX ;
